cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.aff
SFX E   zić       żonym     [^d]zić
SFX E   ić        ony       [^ź]dzić
SFX E   ić        onego     [^ź]dzić
SFX E   ić        onemu     [^ź]dzić
SFX E   ić        ona       [^ź]dzić
SFX E   ić        oną       [^ź]dzić
SFX E   ić        onej      [^ź]dzić
SFX E   ić        one       [^ź]dzić
SFX E   ić        eni       [^ź]dzić
SFX E   ić        onych     [^ź]dzić
SFX E   ić        onymi     [^ź]dzić
SFX E   ić        onym      [^ź]dzić
SFX E   ździć     żdżony    ździć
SFX E   ździć     żdżonego  ździć
SFX E   ździć     żdżonemu  ździć
SFX E   ździć     żdżona    ździć
SFX E   ździć     żdżoną    ździć
SFX E   ździć     żdżonej   ździć
SFX E   ździć     żdżone    ździć
SFX E   ździć     żdżeni    ździć
SFX E   ździć     żdżonych  ździć
SFX E   ździć     żdżonymi  ździć
SFX E   ździć     żdżonym   ździć
SFX E   ć         ony       [bfmnpw]ić
SFX E   ć         onego     [bfmnpw]ić
SFX E   ć         onemu     [bfmnpw]ić
SFX E   ć         ona       [bfmnpw]ić
SFX E   ć         oną       [bfmnpw]ić
SFX E   ć         onej      [bfmnpw]ić
SFX E   ć         one       [bfmnpw]ić
SFX E   ć         eni       [bfmnpw]ić
SFX E   ć         onych     [bfmnpw]ić
SFX E   ć         onymi     [bfmnpw]ić
SFX E   ć         onym      [bfmnpw]ić
SFX E   ić        ony       [^śz][cl]ić
SFX E   ić        onego     [^śz][cl]ić
SFX E   ić        onemu     [^śz][cl]ić
SFX E   ić        ona       [^śz][cl]ić
SFX E   ić        oną       [^śz][cl]ić
SFX E   ić        onej      [^śz][cl]ić
SFX E   ić        one       [^śz][cl]ić
SFX E   ić        eni       [^śz][cl]ić
SFX E   ić        onych     [^śz][cl]ić
SFX E   ić        onymi     [^śz][cl]ić
SFX E   ić        onym      [^śz][cl]ić
SFX E   ić        zony      zcić
SFX E   ić        zonego    zcić
SFX E   ić        zonemu    zcić
SFX E   ić        zona      zcić
SFX E   ić        zoną      zcić
SFX E   ić        zonej     zcić
SFX E   ić        zone      zcić
SFX E   ić        zeni      zcić
SFX E   ić        zonych    zcić
SFX E   ić        zonymi    zcić
SFX E   ić        zonym     zcić
SFX E   ić        ony       ślić
SFX E   ić        onego     ślić
SFX E   ić        onemu     ślić
SFX E   ić        ona       ślić
SFX E   ić        oną       ślić
SFX E   ić        onej      ślić
SFX E   ić        one       ślić
SFX E   ić        eni       ślić
SFX E   ić        onych     ślić
SFX E   ić        onymi     ślić
SFX E   ić        onym      ślić
SFX E   ścić      szczony   ścić
SFX E   ścić      szczonego ścić
SFX E   ścić      szczonemu ścić
SFX E   ścić      szczona   ścić
SFX E   ścić      szczoną   ścić
SFX E   ścić      szczonej  ścić
SFX E   ścić      szczone   ścić
SFX E   ścić      szczeni   ścić
SFX E   ścić      szczonych ścić
SFX E   ścić      szczonymi ścić
SFX E   ścić      szczonym  ścić
SFX E   ić        zony      sić
SFX E   ić        zonego    sić
SFX E   ić        zonemu    sić
SFX E   ić        zona      sić
SFX E   ić        zoną      sić
SFX E   ić        zonej     sić
SFX E   ić        zone      sić
SFX E   ić        zeni      sić
SFX E   ić        zonych    sić
SFX E   ić        zonymi    sić
SFX E   ić        zonym     sić
SFX E   ić        jony      [aeo]ić
SFX E   ić        jonego    [aeo]ić
SFX E   ić        jonemu    [aeo]ić
SFX E   ić        jona      [aeo]ić
SFX E   ić        joną      [aeo]ić
SFX E   ić        jonej     [aeo]ić
SFX E   ić        jone      [aeo]ić
SFX E   ić        jeni      [aeo]ić
SFX E   ić        jonych    [aeo]ić
SFX E   ić        jonymi    [aeo]ić
SFX E   ić        jonym     [aeo]ić
SFX E   ć         ty        uć
SFX E   ć         tego      uć
SFX E   ć         temu      uć
SFX E   ć         ta        uć
SFX E   ć         tą        uć
SFX E   ć         tej       uć
SFX E   ć         te        uć
SFX E   ć         ci        uć
SFX E   ć         tych      uć
SFX E   ć         tymi      uć
SFX E   ć         tym       uć
SFX E   yć        ony       [zż]yć
SFX E   yć        onego     [zż]yć
SFX E   yć        onemu     [zż]yć
SFX E   yć        ona       [zż]yć
SFX E   yć        oną       [zż]yć
SFX E   yć        onej      [zż]yć
SFX E   yć        one       [zż]yć
SFX E   yć        eni       [zż]yć
SFX E   yć        onych     [zż]yć
SFX E   yć        onymi     [zż]yć
SFX E   yć        onym      [zż]yć
SFX E   ć         ty        [bmr]yć
SFX E   ć         tego      [bmr]yć
SFX E   ć         temu      [bmr]yć
SFX E   ć         ta        [bmr]yć
SFX E   ć         tą        [bmr]yć
SFX E   ć         tej       [bmr]yć
SFX E   ć         te        [bmr]yć
SFX E   ć         ci        [bmr]yć
SFX E   ć         tych      [bmr]yć
SFX E   ć         tymi      [bmr]yć
SFX E   ć         tym       [bmr]yć
SFX E   źć        ziony     [ey]źć
SFX E   źć        zionego   [ey]źć
SFX E   źć        zionemu   [ey]źć
SFX E   źć        ziona     [ey]źć
SFX E   źć        zioną     [ey]źć
SFX E   źć        zionej    [ey]źć
SFX E   źć        zione     [ey]źć
SFX E   źć        zieni     [ey]źć
SFX E   źć        zionych   [ey]źć
SFX E   źć        zionymi   [ey]źć
SFX E   źć        zionym    [ey]źć
SFX E   óść       odzony    óść
SFX E   óść       odzonego  óść
SFX E   óść       odzonemu  óść
SFX E   óść       odzona    óść
SFX E   óść       odzoną    óść
SFX E   óść       odzonej   óść
SFX E   óść       odzone    óść
SFX E   óść       odzeni    óść
SFX E   óść       odzonych  óść
SFX E   óść       odzonymi  óść
SFX E   óść       odzonym   óść
SFX E   ść        ciony     gnieść
SFX E   ść        cionego   gnieść
SFX E   ść        cionemu   gnieść
SFX E   ść        ciona     gnieść
SFX E   ść        cioną     gnieść
SFX E   ść        cionej    gnieść
SFX E   ść        cione     gnieść
SFX E   ść        ceni      gnieść
SFX E   ść        cionych   gnieść
SFX E   ść        cionymi   gnieść
SFX E   ść        cionym    gnieść
SFX E   ść        siony     [^g]nieść
SFX E   ść        sionego   [^g]nieść
SFX E   ść        sionemu   [^g]nieść
SFX E   ść        siona     [^g]nieść
SFX E   ść        sioną     [^g]nieść
SFX E   ść        sionej    [^g]nieść
SFX E   ść        sione     [^g]nieść
SFX E   ść        sieni     [^g]nieść
SFX E   ść        sionych   [^g]nieść
SFX E   ść        sionymi   [^g]nieść
SFX E   ść        sionym    [^g]nieść
SFX E   ść        dzony     jeść
SFX E   ść        dzonego   jeść
SFX E   ść        dzonemu   jeść
SFX E   ść        dzona     jeść
SFX E   ść        dzoną     jeść
SFX E   ść        dzonej    jeść
SFX E   ść        dzone     jeść
SFX E   ść        dzeni     jeść
SFX E   ść        dzonych   jeść
SFX E   ść        dzonymi   jeść
SFX E   ść        dzonym    jeść
SFX E   ść        dziony    [łr]aść
SFX E   ść        dzionego  [łr]aść
SFX E   ść        dzionemu  [łr]aść
SFX E   ść        dziona    [łr]aść
SFX E   ść        dzioną    [łr]aść
SFX E   ść        dzionej   [łr]aść
SFX E   ść        dzione    [łr]aść
SFX E   ść        dzeni     [łr]aść
SFX E   ść        dzionych  [łr]aść
SFX E   ść        dzionymi  [łr]aść
SFX E   ść        dzionym   [łr]aść
SFX E   ść        ciony     mieść
SFX E   ść        cionego   mieść
SFX E   ść        cionemu   mieść
SFX E   ść        ciona     mieść
SFX E   ść        cioną     mieść
SFX E   ść        cionej    mieść
SFX E   ść        cione     mieść
SFX E   ść        ceni      mieść
SFX E   ść        cionych   mieść
SFX E   ść        cionymi   mieść
SFX E   ść        cionym    mieść
SFX E   ść        siony     paść
SFX E   ść        sionego   paść
SFX E   ść        sionemu   paść
SFX E   ść        siona     paść
SFX E   ść        sioną     paść
SFX E   ść        sionej    paść
SFX E   ść        sione     paść
SFX E   ść        sieni     paść
SFX E   ść        sionych   paść
SFX E   ść        sionymi   paść
SFX E   ść        sionym    paść
SFX E   ść        ciony     leść
SFX E   ść        cionego   leść
SFX E   ść        cionemu   leść
SFX E   ść        ciona     leść
SFX E   ść        cioną     leść
SFX E   ść        cionej    leść
SFX E   ść        cione     leść
SFX E   ść        ceni      leść
SFX E   ść        cionych   leść
