cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.dic
ambarasować/BEGHJej
arytmetyzować/BEGHJej
bazgrolić/EHIdikv
błaźnić/BEHIdiv
budować/BEGHJej
chlapać/BEHIejv
ciągać/EHIdikv
czasownikować/BEGHJej
deduplikować/BEGHJej
delegować/BEGHJej
derywować/BEGHJej
doangażować/BEHJej
dodzierać/EHIdikv
dojeżdżać/EHIdikv
dolicytować/BEHJej
doniszczyć/EHIdik
dopowiedzieć/EHJejk
dosiadywać/BEGHJej
doszczęśliwiać/EHIdikv
dotrzeć/EFdhi
dragować/BEGHJej
dyspensować/BEGHJej
eksponować/BEGHJej
etylować/BEGHJej
filizować/BEGHJej
freskować/BEGHJej
glinować/BEGHJej
gruszkować/BEGHJdi
higienizować/BEGHJej
inaktywować/BEGHJej
inwigilować/BEGHJej
kanalizować/BEGHJej
katulać/EHIdikv
kminić/EHIdikv
konceptualizować/BEGHJej
kooptować/BEGHJej
krępować/BEGHJej
kurczyć/EHIdikv
lichtować/BEGHJej
łasuchować/BEGHJej
marmoryzować/BEGHJej
miarkować/BEGHJej
modernizować/BEGHJej
naazotować/BEHJej
naciskać/EHIdikv
nadkroić/EHIdik
nadsyłać/EHIdikv
nafosforowywać/BEGHJej
nakarmiać/EHIdikv
nałamać/BEHJej
naobcinać/EHIdik
napiętrzać/EHIdikv
napstrykać/EHIdik
nasiec/BEHIej
nasyłać/EHIdikv
natłumaczyć/EHIdik
nawinąć/BEFIej
nazbijać/EHIdik
nocować/BEGHJej
obdrapać/BEHIej
obiegać/EHIdikv
obliczyć/EHIdik
obmyśliwać/EHIdikv
obryzgiwać/BEGHJej
obstępować/BEGHJej
obtropić/EHIdik
ocembrować/BEHJej
oczesać/BEHJej
odchorować/BEHJej
oddemonizować/BEHJej
odganiać/EHIdikv
odhumusowywać/BEGHJej
odkomuszyć/EHIdik
odładowywać/BEGHJej
odmurować/BEHJej
odpicowywać/BEGHJej
odpowietrzyć/EHIdik
odrdzewić/EHIdik
odsklepiać/EHIdikv
odsypywać/BEGHJej
odtańczyć/EHIdik
odwiewać/EHIdikv
odznaczać/EHIdikv
ogniatać/EHIdikv
okłamywać/BEGHJej
olejować/BEGHJej
opalikować/BEHJej
opiłowywać/BEGHJej
oprotestowywać/BEGHJej
osamotniać/EHIdikv
osmolić/EHIdik
oszczypać/BEHIej
otłuc/BEHJej
ozdrowić/EHIdik
parafować/BEGHJej
personifikować/BEGHJej
pirzgnąć/BEFIej
pobajerować/BEHJej
pochłaniać/EHIdikv
podać/EHdhik
poddzierżawić/EHIdik
podhajcować/BEHJei
podkurować/BEHJej
podmurować/BEHJej
podpasowywać/BEGHJej
podrąbać/BEHJej
podstrajać/EHIdikv
podusić/EHIdik
pofilmować/BEHJej
pogwizdywać/BEGHJej
pokitłasić/EHIdik
pokruszyć/EHIdik
poluzować/BEHJej
pominiować/BEHJej
ponakreślać/EHIdik
poniechiwać/BEGHJej
poobtrącać/EHIdik
poodrywać/EHIdik
poorać/BEHJej
poplądrować/BEHJej
poprosić/EHIdik
poprzesiewać/EHIdik
poprzytulać/EHIdik
porozgarniać/EHIdik
porozścielać/EHIdik
posiatkować/BEHJej
poszachrować/BEHJej
potwierdzić/EHIdik
powkładać/EHIdik
powyładowywać/BEHJej
powytrawiać/EHIdik
pozamarzać/EHIdik
pozdobywać/EHIdik
praskać/EHIdikv
przebóstwić/BEHIdik
przedryblować/BEHJej
przehartowywać/BEGHJej
przekoziołkowywać/BEGHJej
przemieszkać/EHIdik
przepocić/EHIdik
przesłaniać/EHIdikv
przetańcować/BEHJei
przewiwatować/BEHJej
przydymiać/EHIdikv
przymarszczyć/EHIdik
przysadzać/EHIdikv
przyuczać/EHIdikv
realokować/BEGHJej
retweetować/BEGHJej
rozczapierzać/EHIdikv
rozgorączkowywać/BEGHJej
rozkudływać/BEGHJej
rozpaćkać/EHIdik
rozpróżniaczać/EHIdikv
rozszczepić/EHIdik
rozwodnić/BEHIdi
schronologizować/BEHJej
siewać/EHIdikv
skombinować/BEHJej
skubnąć/BEFIej
spedalić/EHIdik
spolszczyć/BEHIdik
srebrzyć/BEHIdikv
strząchać/EHIdikv
szerzyć/EHIdikv
świntuszyć/EHIdikv
transplantować/BEGHJej
ubielać/EHIdikv
udowodnić/BEHIdi
ujednorodnić/BEHIdi
ułaskawiać/EHIdikv
uniformizować/BEGHJej
upomnieć/EHehjk
urządzać/EHIdikv
usypywać/BEGHJej
utrwalać/EHIdikv
uzdatniać/EHIdikv
wdmuchnąć/BEFIej
wkluczyć/EHIdik
wpierniczyć/EHIdik
współredagować/BEGHJej
wyakcentować/BEHJej
wychorować/BEHJei
wydobyć/BEHIej
wyglansować/BEHJej
wykarczować/BEHJej
wyksięgować/BEHJej
wymarzać/EHIdikv
wyodrębniać/EHIdikv
wyplunąć/BEFIej
wyrafinować/BEHJej
wyskrobać/BEHJej
wyszarpać/BEHIej
wytarzać/EHIdik
wywietrzać/EHIdikv
zaadoptować/BEHJej
zacentrować/BEHJej
zadiustować/BEHJej
zagnieść/EFIdik
zakapturzać/EHIdikv
zakrzykiwać/BEGHJej
zamieszczać/EHIdikv
zapakowywać/BEGHJej
zaproksymować/BEHJej
zasadzić/EHIdik
zaszamotać/BEHIJdik
zatrwożyć/EHIdik
zaznajomić/EHIdik
zdecydować/BEHJej
zdislajkować/BEHJej
zespiralizować/BEHJej
zgodzić/BEHIdi
zjeżdżać/EHIdikv
zmegafonizować/BEHJdi
znieczulać/EHIdikv
zrelatywizować/BEHJej
zszatkować/BEHJej
zwyższać/EHIdikv
